Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 84-1101 to 84-1116 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska General Emergency Succession Act.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 1, p. 1515.